Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMENDMENTS TO THE CONSTITUTION OF ARKANSAS OF 1874

Publisher's Notes.

Amendments to the Constitution have been inconsistently numbered both as proposed and as compiled in previous digests and compilations. This volume uses the numbers assigned by the Secretary of State in 1932 and used in Pope's Digest of 1937, which omitted certain prior amendments which were deemed superseded by later amendments.